Utah statutes.
63A-4-203.   Refusal of agency to pay charges -- Notice to the Division of Finance for collection.

(1)  If any agency of the state refuses to remit any payment as charged by the risk manager within 30 days after the date due, the risk manager may certify to the  director of the Division of Finance the fact of the refusal and the amount of the delinquent payment, together with a request that the amount be transferred from funds of the delinquent agency to the Risk Management Fund.

(2)  The risk manager shall mail a copy of the certification and request to the delinquent agency.

(3)  The risk manager shall resolve claims against the fund in an expeditious manner.

